Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB830.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1303.1-A(a) and (e) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949, IS amended to read:Section 1303.1-A. Policy Relating to Bullying.--(a) No later than January 1, 2009, each school entity shall adopt a policy or amend its existing policy relating to bullying and incorporate the policy into the school entity's code of student conduct required under 22 Pa. Code § 12.3(c) (relating to school <--<--1234567891011121314151617 rules). The policy shall delineate disciplinary consequences for bullying and may provide for prevention, intervention and education programs, provided that no school entity shall be required to establish a new policy under this section if one currently exists and reasonably fulfills the requirements of this section. The policy shall identify the appropriate school staff person to receive reports of incidents of alleged bullying. The policy shall include mechanisms to notify parents and legal guardians of children involved in a bullying or cyberbullying incident within five (5) days of the incident. A school entity's notification to a parent about an incident or a report of bullying, cyberbullying or retaliation must comply with 20 U.S.C. § 1232g (relating to family educational and privacy rights) and 34 CFR Pt. 99 (relating to family educational rights and privacy). THE POLICY SHALL REQUIRE ALL INCIDENTS OF ALLEGED BULLYING TO BE INVESTIGATED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY AND ESTABLISH A PROCEDURE FOR INVESTIGATING A REPORT OF AN INCIDENT OF ALLEGED BULLYING RECEIVED BY THE SCHOOL ENTITY. UPON INVESTIGATION AND NOT LATER THAN TWENTY-FOUR (24) HOURS AFTER DETERMINING THAT AN INCIDENT OF BULLYING HAS OCCURRED, THE SCHOOL ENTITY SHALL NOTIFY THE PARENTS AND LEGAL GUARDIANS OF THE TARGET AND THE AGGRESSOR OF THE DETERMINATION AND THE SCHOOL ENTITY'S PROCEDURES FOLLOWING THE INVESTIGATION. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT A SCHOOL ENTITY FROM CONTACTING A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF A TARGET OR AGGRESSOR ABOUT A REPORT OF AN ALLEGED INCIDENT OF BULLYING PRIOR TO A DETERMINATION THAT AN INCIDENT OF BULLYING HAS OCCURRED.* * *(e) For purposes of this article, "bullying" shall mean an intentional electronic, written, verbal or physical act, or a 20250HB0830PN3063 - 2 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 series of acts:(1) directed at another student or students;(2) which occurs in a school setting;(3) that is severe, persistent or pervasive; and(4) that has the effect of doing any of the following:(i) substantially interfering with a student's education;(ii) creating a threatening environment; or(iii) substantially disrupting the orderly operation of the school; [and]"cyberbullying" shall mean a written, verbal or physical act or series of acts of bullying that are committed during school hours and through the use of data or computer software accessed through a:(1) computer;(2) computer system;(3) computer network; or(4) cellular telephone or other wireless or cellular communications device; and"school setting" shall mean in the school, on school grounds, in school vehicles, at a designated bus stop or at any activity sponsored, supervised or sanctioned by the school.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0830PN3063 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122